Idaho, session 2025, H0201.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-265, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-265. PROVIDER PAYMENT. (1) Where there is an equivalent, the pay-
ment to medicaid providers:
(a) May be up to but shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the
current medicare rate for primary care procedure codes as defined by the
centers for medicare and medicaid services; and
(b) Shall be ninety percent (90%) of the current medicare rate for all
other procedure codes.
(2) Where there is no medicare equivalent, the payment rate to medicaid
providers shall be prescribed by rule.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the
services are provided by a private, freestanding mental health hospital
facility that is an institution for mental disease as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1396d(i), the department shall reimburse for inpatient services at a rate
not to exceed ninety-one percent (91%) of the current medicare rate within
federally allowed reimbursement under the medicaid program. The reimburse-
ment provided for in this subsection shall be effective until July 1, 2021.
(4) The department shall, through the annual budget process, include
a line-item request for adjustments to provider rates. All changes to
provider payment rates shall be subject to approval of the legislature by
appropriation.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the depart-
ment may enter into agreements with providers to pay for services based on
their value in terms of measurable health care quality and positive impacts
to participant health.
(a) Any such agreement shall be designed to be cost-neutral or cost-
saving compared to other payment methodologies.
(b) The department is authorized to pursue waiver agreements with the
federal government as needed to support value-based payment arrange-
ments, up to and including fully capitated provider-based managed care.
(c) Agreements between the department and value care organizations
shall require value care organizations to select a minimum risk sharing
level of:
(i) Forty percent (40%) for the performance year commencing July
1, 2026;


(ii) Fifty percent (50%) for the performance year commencing July
1, 2027;
(iii) Sixty percent (60%)for the performance year commencing July
1, 2028; and
(iv) Seventy percent (70%) for the performance year commencing
July 1, 2029, and all subsequent performance years.
(6) Medicaid reimbursement for critical access, out-of-state, and
state-owned hospitals shall be as follows:
(a) In-state, critical access hospitals as designated according to 42
U.S.C. 1395i-4(c)(2)(B) shall be reimbursed at one hundred one percent
(101%) of cost;
(b) Out-of-state hospitals shall be reimbursed at eighty-seven percent
(87%) of cost;
(c) State-owned hospitals shall be reimbursed at one hundred percent
(100%) of cost; and
(d) Out-of-state hospital institutions for mental disease as defined
in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(i) shall be reimbursed at a per diem equivalent to
ninety-five percent (95%) of cost.
(7) The department shall equitably reduce net reimbursements for all
hospital services, including in-state institutions for mental disease but
excluding all hospitals and institutions described in subsection (6) of
this section, by amounts targeted to reduce general fund needs for hospital
payments by three million one hundred thousand dollars ($3,100,000) in state
fiscal year 2020 and eight million seven hundred twenty thousand dollars
($8,720,000) in state fiscal year 2021.
(8) The department shall work with all Idaho hospitals, including in-
stitutions for mental disease as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(i), to establish
value-based payment methods for inpatient and outpatient hospital services
to replace existing cost-based reimbursement methods for in-state hospi-
tals, other than those hospitals and institutions described in subsection
(6) of this section, effective July 1, 2021. Budgets for hospital payments
shall be subject to prospective legislative approval.
(9) The department shall work with Idaho hospitals to establish a
quality payment program for inpatient and outpatient adjustment payments
described in section 56-1406, Idaho Code. Inpatient and outpatient adjust-
ment payments shall be subject to increase or reduction based on hospital
service quality measures established by the department in consultation with
Idaho hospitals.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.